Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 6
Default

§ 28-9-601. Rights after default — Judicial enforcement — Consignor or buyer of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles or promissory notes.

After default, a secured party has the rights provided in this part and, except as otherwise provided in section 28-9-602[, Idaho Code], those provided by agreement of the parties. A secured party:

May reduce a claim to judgment, foreclose or otherwise enforce the claim, security interest or agricultural lien by any available judicial procedure; and

If the collateral is documents, may proceed either as to the documents or as to the goods they cover.

A secured party in possession of collateral or control of collateral under section 28-7-106, 28-9-104, 28-9-105, 28-9-106 or 28-9-107[, Idaho Code,] has the rights and duties provided in section 28-9-207[, Idaho Code].

The rights under subsections (a) and (b) of this section are cumulative and may be exercised simultaneously.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (g) of this section and section 28-9-605[, Idaho Code], after default, a debtor and an obligor have the rights provided in this part and by agreement of the parties.

If a secured party has reduced its claim to judgment, the lien of any levy that may be made upon the collateral by virtue of an execution based upon the judgment relates back to the earliest of:

The date of perfection of the security interest or agricultural lien in the collateral;

The date of filing a financing statement covering the collateral; or

Any date specified in a statute under which the agricultural lien was created.

A sale pursuant to an execution is a foreclosure of the security interest or agricultural lien by judicial procedure within the meaning of this section. A secured party may purchase at the sale and thereafter hold the collateral free of any other requirements of this chapter.

Except as otherwise provided in section 28-9-607(c)[, Idaho Code], this part imposes no duties upon a secured party that is a consignor or is a buyer of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-601, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704; am. 2004, ch. 42, § 32, p. 77.

§ 28-9-602. Waiver and variance of rights and duties.

Except as otherwise provided in section 28-9-624[, Idaho Code], to the extent that they give rights to a debtor or obligor and impose duties on a secured party, the debtor or obligor may not waive or vary the rules stated in the following listed sections:

Section 28-9-207(b)(4)(C)[, Idaho Code], which deals with use and operation of the collateral by the secured party;

Section 28-9-210[, Idaho Code], which deals with requests for an accounting and requests concerning a list of collateral and statement of account;

Section 28-9-607(c)[, Idaho Code], which deals with collection and enforcement of collateral;

Sections 28-9-608(a) and 28-9-615(c)[, Idaho Code,] to the extent that they deal with application or payment of noncash proceeds of collection, enforcement, or disposition;

Sections 28-9-608(a) and 28-9-615(d)[, Idaho Code,] to the extent that they require accounting for or payment of surplus proceeds of collateral;

Section 28-9-609[, Idaho Code,] to the extent that it imposes upon a secured party that takes possession of collateral without judicial process the duty to do so without breach of the peace;

Sections 28-9-610(b), 28-9-611, 28-9-613 and 28-9-614[, Idaho Code], which deal with disposition of collateral;

Section 28-9-615(f)[, Idaho Code], which deals with calculation of a deficiency or surplus when a disposition is made to the secured party, a person related to the secured party, or a secondary obligor;

Section 28-9-616[, Idaho Code], which deals with explanation of the calculation of a surplus or deficiency;

Sections 28-9-620, 28-9-621 and 28-9-622[, Idaho Code], which deal with acceptance of collateral in satisfaction of obligation;

Section 28-9-623[, Idaho Code], which deals with redemption of collateral;

Section 28-9-624[, Idaho Code], which deals with permissible waivers; and

Sections 28-9-625 and 28-9-626[, Idaho Code], which deal with the secured party’s liability for failure to comply with this chapter.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-602, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

Section 31 of S.L. 2001, ch. 208 provided that the act should take effect on and after July 1, 2001.
CASE NOTES

Provision in a lease purporting to grant a lessor of real property the right to destroy the buildings on the property was invalid to the extent that it was in conflict with this section, which sets forth various provisions of the Idaho Uniform Commercial Code that cannot be waived or varied to the extent that they give rights to a debtor or obligor and impose duties on the secured party. Nicholson v. Coeur d’Alene Placer Mining Corp., 161 Idaho 877, 392 P.3d 1218 (2017).

§ 28-9-603. Agreement on standards concerning rights and duties.

The parties may determine by agreement the standards measuring the fulfillment of the rights of a debtor or obligor and the duties of a secured party under a rule stated in section 28-9-602[, Idaho Code,] if the standards are not manifestly unreasonable.

Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to the duty under section 28-9-609[, Idaho Code,] to refrain from breaching the peace.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-603, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-604. Procedure if security agreement covers real property or fixtures.

If a security agreement covers both personal and real property, a secured party may proceed:

Under this part as to the personal property without prejudicing any rights with respect to the real property; or

As to both the personal property and the real property in accordance with the rights with respect to the real property, in which case the other provisions of this part do not apply.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, if a security agreement covers goods that are or become fixtures, a secured party may proceed:

Under this part; or

In accordance with the rights with respect to real property, in which case the other provisions of this part do not apply.

Subject to the other provisions of this part, if a secured party holding a security interest in fixtures has priority over all owners and encumbrancers of the real property, the secured party, after default, may remove the collateral from the real property.

A secured party that removes collateral shall promptly reimburse any encumbrancer or owner of the real property, other than the debtor, for the cost of repair of any physical injury caused by the removal. The secured party need not reimburse the encumbrancer or owner for any diminution in value of the real property caused by the absence of the goods removed or by any necessity of replacing them. A person entitled to reimbursement may refuse permission to remove until the secured party gives adequate assurance for the performance of the obligation to reimburse.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-604, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-605. Unknown debtor or secondary obligor.

A secured party does not owe a duty based on its status as secured party:

To a person that is a debtor or obligor, unless the secured party knows:

That the person is a debtor or obligor;

The identity of the person; and

How to communicate with the person; or

To a secured party or lienholder that has filed a financing statement against a person, unless the secured party knows:

That the person is a debtor; and

The identity of the person.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-605, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-606. Time of default for agricultural lien.

For purposes of this part, a default occurs in connection with an agricultural lien at the time the secured party becomes entitled to enforce the lien in accordance with the statute under which it was created.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-606, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-607. Collection and enforcement by secured party.

If so agreed, and in any event after default, a secured party:

May notify an account debtor or other person obligated on collateral to make payment or otherwise render performance to or for the benefit of the secured party;

May take any proceeds to which the secured party is entitled under section 28-9-315, Idaho Code;

May enforce the obligations of an account debtor or other person obligated on collateral and exercise the rights of the debtor with respect to the obligation of the account debtor or other person obligated on collateral to make payment or otherwise render performance to the debtor, and with respect to any property that secures the obligations of the account debtor or other person obligated on the collateral;

If it holds a security interest in a deposit account perfected by control under section 28-9-104(a)(1), Idaho Code, may apply the balance of the deposit account to the obligation secured by the deposit account; and

If it holds a security interest in a deposit account perfected by control under section 28-9-104(a)(2) or (3), Idaho Code, may instruct the bank to pay the balance of the deposit account to or for the benefit of the secured party.

If necessary to enable a secured party to exercise, under subsection (a)(3) of this section, the right of a debtor to enforce a mortgage nonjudicially, the secured party may record in the office in which a record of the mortgage is recorded:

A copy of the security agreement that creates or provides for a security interest in the obligation secured by the mortgage; and

The secured party’s sworn affidavit in recordable form stating that:

a default has occurred with respect to the obligation secured by the mortgage; and

the secured party is entitled to enforce the mortgage nonjudicially.

A secured party shall proceed in a commercially reasonable manner if the secured party:

Undertakes to collect from or enforce an obligation of an account debtor or other person obligated on collateral; and

Is entitled to charge back uncollected collateral or otherwise to full or limited recourse against the debtor or a secondary obligor.

A secured party may deduct from the collections made pursuant to subsection (c) of this section reasonable expenses of collection and enforcement, including reasonable attorney’s fees and legal expenses incurred by the secured party.

This section does not determine whether an account debtor, bank, or other person obligated on collateral owes a duty to a secured party.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-607, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704; am. 2012, ch. 145, § 19, p. 381.

§ 28-9-608. Application of proceeds of collection or enforcement — Liability for deficiency and right to surplus.

If a security interest or agricultural lien secures payment or performance of an obligation, the following rules apply:

A secured party shall apply or pay over for application the cash proceeds of collection or enforcement under section 28-9-607[, Idaho Code,] in the following order to:

the reasonable expenses of collection and enforcement and, to the extent provided for by agreement and not prohibited by law, reasonable attorney’s fees and legal expenses incurred by the secured party;

the satisfaction of obligations secured by the security interest or agricultural lien under which the collection or enforcement is made; and

the satisfaction of obligations secured by any subordinate security interest in or other lien on the collateral subject to the security interest or agricultural lien under which the collection or enforcement is made if the secured party receives an authenticated demand for proceeds before distribution of the proceeds is completed.

If requested by a secured party, a holder of a subordinate security interest or other lien shall furnish reasonable proof of the interest or lien within a reasonable time. Unless the holder complies, the secured party need not comply with the holder’s demand under subsection (1)(C) of this section.

A secured party need not apply or pay over for application noncash proceeds of collection and enforcement under section 28-9-607[, Idaho Code,] unless the failure to do so would be commercially unreasonable. A secured party that applies or pays over for application noncash proceeds shall do so in a commercially reasonable manner.

A secured party shall account to and pay a debtor for any surplus, and the obligor is liable for any deficiency.

If the underlying transaction is a sale of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles or promissory notes, the debtor is not entitled to any surplus, and the obligor is not liable for any deficiency.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-608, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-609. Secured party’s right to take possession after default.

After default, a secured party:

May take possession of the collateral; and

Without removal, may render equipment unusable and dispose of collateral on a debtor’s premises under section 28-9-610[, Idaho Code].

A secured party may proceed under subsection (a) of this section:

Pursuant to judicial process; or

Without judicial process, if it proceeds without breach of the peace.

If so agreed, and in any event after default, a secured party may require the debtor to assemble the collateral and make it available to the secured party at a place to be designated by the secured party which is reasonably convenient to both parties.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-609, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-610. Disposition of collateral after default.

After default, a secured party may sell, lease, license or otherwise dispose of any or all of the collateral in its present condition or following any commercially reasonable preparation or processing.

Every aspect of a disposition of collateral, including the method, manner, time, place, and other terms, must be commercially reasonable. If commercially reasonable, a secured party may dispose of collateral by public or private proceedings, by one (1) or more contracts, as a unit or in parcels, and at any time and place and on any terms.

A secured party may purchase collateral:

At a public disposition; or

At a private disposition only if the collateral is of a kind that is customarily sold on a recognized market or the subject of widely distributed standard price quotations.

A contract for sale, lease, license, or other disposition includes the warranties relating to title, possession, quiet enjoyment, and the like which by operation of law accompany a voluntary disposition of property of the kind subject to the contract.

A secured party may disclaim or modify warranties under subsection (d) of this section:

In a manner that would be effective to disclaim or modify the warranties in a voluntary disposition of property of the kind subject to the contract of disposition; or

By communicating to the purchaser a record evidencing the contract for disposition and including an express disclaimer or modification of the warranties.

A record is sufficient to disclaim warranties under subsection (e) of this section if it indicates “There is no warranty relating to title, possession, quiet enjoyment, or the like in this disposition” or uses words of similar import.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-610, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-611. Notification before disposition of collateral.

In this section, “notification date” means the earlier of the date on which:

A secured party sends to the debtor and any secondary obligor an authenticated notification of disposition; or

The debtor and any secondary obligor waive the right to notification.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section, a secured party that disposes of collateral under section 28-9-610[, Idaho Code,] shall send to the persons specified in subsection (c) of this section a reasonable authenticated notification of disposition.

To comply with subsection (b) of this section, the secured party shall send an authenticated notification of disposition to:

The debtor;

Any secondary obligor; and

If the collateral is other than consumer goods:

any other person from which the secured party has received, before the notification date, an authenticated notification of a claim of an interest in the collateral;

any other secured party or lienholder that, ten (10) days before the notification date, held a security interest in or other lien on the collateral perfected by the filing of a financing statement that:

identified the collateral;

was indexed under the debtor’s name as of that date; and

was filed in the office in which to file a financing statement against the debtor covering the collateral as of that date; and

Subsection (b) of this section does not apply if the collateral is perishable or threatens to decline speedily in value or is of a type customarily sold on a recognized market.

A secured party complies with the requirement for notification prescribed by subsection (c)(3)(B) of this section if:

Not later than twenty (20) days or earlier than thirty (30) days before the notification date, the secured party requests, in a commercially reasonable manner, information concerning financing statements indexed under the debtor’s name in the office indicated in subsection (c)(3)(B) of this section; and

Before the notification date, the secured party:

did not receive a response to the request for information; or

received a response to the request for information and sent an authenticated notification of disposition to each secured party or other lienholder named in that response whose financing statement covered the collateral.

(C) any other secured party that, ten (10) days before the notification date, held a security interest in the collateral perfected by compliance with a statute, regulation, or treaty described in section 28-9-311(a)[, Idaho Code].

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-611, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-612. Timeliness of notification before disposition of collateral.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, whether a notification is sent within a reasonable time is a question of fact.

A notification of disposition sent after default and ten (10) days or more before the earliest time of disposition set forth in the notification is sent within a reasonable time before the disposition.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-612, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-613. Contents and form of notification before disposition of collateral — General.

Except in a consumer goods transaction, the following rules apply:

The contents of a notification of disposition are sufficient if the notification:

Describes the debtor and the secured party;

Describes the collateral that is the subject of the intended disposition;

States the method of intended disposition;

States that the debtor is entitled to an accounting of the unpaid indebtedness and states the charge, if any, for an accounting; and

States the time and place of a public disposition or the time after which any other disposition is to be made.

Whether the contents of a notification that lacks any of the information specified in subsection (1) of this section are nevertheless sufficient is a question of fact.

The contents of a notification providing substantially the information specified in subsection (1) of this section are sufficient, even if the notification includes:

Information not specified by subsection (1) of this section; or

Minor errors that are not seriously misleading.

A particular phrasing of the notification is not required.

The following form of notification and the form appearing in section 28-9-614(3), when completed, each provides sufficient information:

§ 28-9-614. Contents and form of notification before disposition of collateral — Consumer goods transaction.

In a consumer goods transaction, the following rules apply:

A notification of disposition must provide the following information:

The information specified in section 28-9-613(1)[, Idaho Code];

A description of any liability for a deficiency of the person to which the notification is sent;

A telephone number from which the amount that must be paid to the secured party to redeem the collateral under section 28-9-623[, Idaho Code,] is available; and

A telephone number or mailing address from which additional information concerning the disposition and the obligation secured is available.

A particular phrasing of the notification is not required.

The following form of notification, when completed, provides sufficient information:

........ (Name and address of secured party)...............................

........ (Date)...............................

§ 28-9-615. Application of proceeds of disposition — Liability for deficiency and right to surplus.

A secured party shall apply or pay over for application the cash proceeds of disposition under section 28-9-610[, Idaho Code,] in the following order to:

The reasonable expenses of retaking, holding, preparing for disposition, processing and disposing, and, to the extent provided for by agreement and not prohibited by law, reasonable attorney’s fees and legal expenses incurred by the secured party;

The satisfaction of obligations secured by the security interest or agricultural lien under which the disposition is made;

The satisfaction of obligations secured by any subordinate security interest in or other subordinate lien on the collateral if:

the secured party receives from the holder of the subordinate security interest or other lien an authenticated demand for proceeds before distribution of the proceeds is completed; and

in a case in which a consignor has an interest in the collateral, the subordinate security interest or other lien is senior to the interest of the consignor; and

A secured party that is a consignor of the collateral if the secured party receives from the consignor an authenticated demand for proceeds before distribution of the proceeds is completed.

If requested by a secured party, a holder of a subordinate security interest or other lien shall furnish reasonable proof of the interest or lien within a reasonable time. Unless the holder does so, the secured party need not comply with the holder’s demand under subsection (a)(3) of this section.

A secured party need not apply or pay over for application noncash proceeds of disposition under section 28-9-610[, Idaho Code,] unless the failure to do so would be commercially unreasonable. A secured party that applies or pays over for application noncash proceeds shall do so in a commercially reasonable manner.

If the security interest under which a disposition is made secures payment or performance of an obligation, after making the payments and applications required by subsection (a) of this section and permitted by subsection (c) of this section:

Unless subsection (a)(4) of this section requires the secured party to apply or pay over cash proceeds to a consignor, the secured party shall account to and pay a debtor for any surplus; and

The obligor is liable for any deficiency.

If the underlying transaction is a sale of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles or promissory notes:

The debtor is not entitled to any surplus; and

The obligor is not liable for any deficiency.

The surplus or deficiency following a disposition is calculated based on the amount of proceeds that would have been realized in a disposition complying with this part to a transferee other than the secured party, a person related to the secured party, or a secondary obligor if:

The transferee in the disposition is the secured party, a person related to the secured party or a secondary obligor; and

The amount of proceeds of the disposition is significantly below the range of proceeds that a complying disposition to a person other than the secured party, a person related to the secured party, or a secondary obligor would have brought.
(g) A secured party that receives cash proceeds of a disposition in good faith and without knowledge that the receipt violates the rights of the holder of a security interest or other lien that is not subordinate to the security interest or agricultural lien under which the disposition is made:

Is not obligated to account to or pay the holder of the security interest or other lien for any surplus.

(1) Takes the cash proceeds free of the security interest or other lien;

(2) Is not obligated to apply the proceeds of the disposition to the satisfaction of obligations secured by the security interest or other lien; and

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-615, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-616. Explanation of calculation of surplus or deficiency.

In this section:

“Explanation” means a writing that:

states the amount of the surplus or deficiency;

provides an explanation in accordance with subsection (c) of this section of how the secured party calculated the surplus or deficiency;

states, if applicable, that future debits, credits, charges, including additional credit service charges or interest, rebates, and expenses may affect the amount of the surplus or deficiency; and

provides a telephone number or mailing address from which additional information concerning the transaction is available.

“Request” means a record:

authenticated by a debtor or consumer obligor;

requesting that the recipient provide an explanation; and

sent after disposition of the collateral under section 28-9-610[, Idaho Code].

In a consumer goods transaction in which the debtor is entitled to a surplus or a consumer obligor is liable for a deficiency under section 28-9-615[, Idaho Code], the secured party shall:

Send an explanation to the debtor or consumer obligor, as applicable, after the disposition and:

before or when the secured party accounts to the debtor and pays any surplus or first makes written demand on the consumer obligor after the disposition for payment of the deficiency; and

within fourteen (14) days after receipt of a request; or

In the case of a consumer obligor who is liable for a deficiency, within fourteen (14) days after receipt of a request, send to the consumer obligor a record waiving the secured party’s right to a deficiency.

To comply with subsection (a)(1)(B) of this section, a writing must provide the following information in the following order:

The aggregate amount of obligations secured by the security interest under which the disposition was made, and, if the amount reflects a rebate of unearned interest or credit service charge, an indication of that fact, calculated as of a specified date:

if the secured party takes or receives possession of the collateral after default, not more than thirty-five (35) days before the secured party takes or receives possession; or

if the secured party takes or receives possession of the collateral before default or does not take possession of the collateral, not more than thirty-five (35) days before the disposition;

The amount of proceeds of the disposition;

The aggregate amount of the obligations after deducting the amount of proceeds;

The amount, in the aggregate or by type, and types of expenses, including expenses of retaking, holding, preparing for disposition, processing, and disposing of the collateral, and attorney’s fees secured by the collateral which are known to the secured party and relate to the current disposition;
(5) The amount, in the aggregate or by type, and types of credits, including rebates of interest or credit service charges, to which the obligor is known to be entitled and which are not reflected in the amount in paragraph (1) of this subsection; and

A particular phrasing of the explanation is not required. An explanation complying substantially with the requirements of subsection (a) of this section is sufficient, even if it includes minor errors that are not seriously misleading.

A debtor or consumer obligor is entitled without charge to one (1) response to a request under this section during any six (6) month period in which the secured party did not send to the debtor or consumer obligor an explanation pursuant to subsection (b)(1) of this section. The secured party may require payment of a charge not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each additional response.

(6) The amount of the surplus or deficiency.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-616, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-617. Rights of transferee of collateral.

A secured party’s disposition of collateral after default:

Transfers to a transferee for value all of the debtor’s rights in the collateral;

Discharges the security interest under which the disposition is made; and

Discharges any subordinate security interest or other subordinate lien.

A transferee that acts in good faith takes free of the rights and interests described in subsection (a) of this section, even if the secured party fails to comply with this chapter or the requirements of any judicial proceeding.

If a transferee does not take free of the rights and interests described in subsection (a) of this section, the transferee takes the collateral subject to:

The debtor’s rights in the collateral;

The security interest or agricultural lien under which the disposition is made; and

Any other security interest or other lien.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-617, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-618. Rights and duties of certain secondary obligors.

A secondary obligor acquires the rights and becomes obligated to perform the duties of the secured party after the secondary obligor:

Receives an assignment of a secured obligation from the secured party;

Receives a transfer of collateral from the secured party and agrees to accept the rights and assume the duties of the secured party; or

Is subrogated to the rights of a secured party with respect to collateral.

An assignment, transfer or subrogation described in subsection (a) of this section:

Is not a disposition of collateral under section 28-9-610[, Idaho Code]; and

Relieves the secured party of further duties under this chapter.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-618, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-619. Transfer of record or legal title.

In this section, “transfer statement” means a record authenticated by a secured party stating:

That the debtor has defaulted in connection with an obligation secured by specified collateral;

That the secured party has exercised its postdefault remedies with respect to the collateral;

That, by reason of the exercise, a transferee has acquired the rights of the debtor in the collateral; and

The name and mailing address of the secured party, debtor and transferee.

A transfer statement entitles the transferee to the transfer of record of all rights of the debtor in the collateral specified in the statement in any official filing, recording, registration, or certificate of title system covering the collateral. If a transfer statement is presented with the applicable fee and request form to the official or office responsible for maintaining the system, the official or office shall:

Accept the transfer statement;

Promptly amend its records to reflect the transfer; and

If applicable, issue a new appropriate certificate of title in the name of the transferee.

A transfer of the record or legal title to collateral to a secured party under subsection (b) of this section or otherwise is not of itself a disposition of collateral under this chapter and does not of itself relieve the secured party of its duties under this chapter.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-619, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-620. Acceptance of collateral in full or partial satisfaction of obligation — Compulsory disposition of collateral.

A secured party may accept collateral in full or partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures only if:

The debtor consents to the acceptance under subsection (c) of this section;

The secured party does not receive, within the time set forth in subsection (d) of this section, a notification of objection to the proposal authenticated by:

a person to which the secured party was required to send a proposal under section 28-9-621[, Idaho Code]; or

any other person, other than the debtor, holding an interest in the collateral subordinate to the security interest that is the subject of the proposal; and

Subsection (e) of this section does not require the secured party to dispose of the collateral or the debtor waives the requirement pursuant to section 28-9-624[, Idaho Code].

A purported or apparent acceptance of collateral under this section is ineffective unless:

The secured party consents to the acceptance in an authenticated record or sends a proposal to the debtor; and

The conditions of subsection (a) of this section are met.

For purposes of this section:

A debtor consents to an acceptance of collateral in partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures only if the debtor agrees to the terms of the acceptance in a record authenticated after default; and

A debtor consents to an acceptance of collateral in full satisfaction of the obligation it secures only if the debtor agrees to the terms of the acceptance in a record authenticated after default or the secured party:

sends to the debtor after default a proposal that is unconditional or subject only to a condition that collateral not in the possession of the secured party be preserved or maintained;

in the proposal, proposes to accept collateral in full satisfaction of the obligation it secures; and

does not receive a notification of objection authenticated by the debtor within twenty (20) days after the proposal is sent.

To be effective under subsection (a)(2) of this section, a notification of objection must be received by the secured party:

In the case of a person to which the proposal was sent pursuant to section 28-9-621[, Idaho Code], within twenty (20) days after notification was sent to that person; and

In other cases:

within twenty (20) days after the last notification was sent pursuant to section 28-9-621[, Idaho Code]; or

if a notification was not sent, before the debtor consents to the acceptance under subsection (c) of this section.

A secured party that has taken possession of collateral shall dispose of the collateral pursuant to section 28-9-610[, Idaho Code,] within the time specified in subsection (f) of this section if:

Sixty percent (60%) of the cash price has been paid in the case of a purchase-money security interest in consumer goods; or
(2) Sixty percent (60%) of the principal amount of the obligation secured has been paid in the case of a nonpurchase-money security interest in consumer goods.

To comply with subsection (e) of this section, the secured party shall dispose of the collateral:

Within ninety (90) days after taking possession; or

Within any longer period to which the debtor and all secondary obligors have agreed in an agreement to that effect entered into and authenticated after default.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-620, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-621. Notification of proposal to accept collateral.

A secured party that desires to accept collateral in full or partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures shall send its proposal to:

Any person from which the secured party has received, before the debtor consented to the acceptance, an authenticated notification of a claim of an interest in the collateral;

Any other secured party or lienholder that, ten (10) days before the debtor consented to the acceptance, held a security interest in or other lien on the collateral perfected by the filing of a financing statement that:

identified the collateral;

was indexed under the debtor’s name as of that date; and

was filed in the office or offices in which to file a financing statement against the debtor covering the collateral as of that date; and

Any other secured party that, ten (10) days before the debtor consented to the acceptance, held a security interest in the collateral perfected by compliance with a statute, regulation, or treaty described in section 28-9-311(a)[, Idaho Code].

A secured party that desires to accept collateral in partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures shall send its proposal to any secondary obligor in addition to the persons described in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-621, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-622. Effect of acceptance of collateral.

A secured party’s acceptance of collateral in full or partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures:

Discharges the obligation to the extent consented to by the debtor;

Transfers to the secured party all of a debtor’s rights in the collateral;

Discharges the security interest or agricultural lien that is the subject of the debtor’s consent and any subordinate security interest or other subordinate lien; and

Terminates any other subordinate interest.

A subordinate interest is discharged or terminated under subsection (a) of this section, even if the secured party fails to comply with this chapter.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-622, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-623. Right to redeem collateral.

A debtor, any secondary obligor, or any other secured party or lienholder may redeem collateral.

To redeem collateral, a person shall tender:

Fulfillment of all obligations secured by the collateral; and

The reasonable expenses and attorney’s fees described in section 28-9-615(a)(1)[, Idaho Code].

A redemption may occur at any time before a secured party:

Has collected collateral under section 28-9-607[, Idaho Code];

Has disposed of collateral or entered into a contract for its disposition under section 28-9-610[, Idaho Code]; or

Has accepted collateral in full or partial satisfaction of the obligation it secures under section 28-9-622[, Idaho Code].

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-623, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.

§ 28-9-624. Waiver.

A debtor or secondary obligor may waive the right to notification of disposition of collateral under section 28-9-611[, Idaho Code,] only by an agreement to that effect entered into and authenticated after default.

A debtor may waive the right to require disposition of collateral under section 28-9-620(e)[, Idaho Code,] only by an agreement to that effect entered into and authenticated after default.

Except in a consumer goods transaction, a debtor or secondary obligor may waive the right to redeem collateral under section 28-9-623[, Idaho Code,] only by an agreement to that effect entered into and authenticated after default.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-9-624, as added by 2001, ch. 208, § 2, p. 704.